Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.355

Actions against agencies.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the secretary may, in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the attorney general, who shall represent the department in the proceeding, maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or such other relief as he or she may deem advisable against any agency subject to licensing under the provisions of this chapter or against any such agency not having a license as heretofore provided in this chapter.

[ 2018 c 58 s 36; 2006 c 265 s 314. Formerly RCW 43.215.330.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.